South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4012.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 37-29-110 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 37-29-110. PalmettoPride is governed by a board of directors composed of eleven twelve members to be appointed as follows:  five members of the public must be appointed by the Governor; three members must be appointed by the President of the Senate, to include one Senator and two members of the public;  three members must be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, to include one member of the House of Representatives and two members of the public; and the Secretary of Transportation, or his or her designee. The members of the board shall elect the chairman of the board from among the public members. The board members shall serve terms of four years. A vacancy that occurs on the board must be filled by appointment by the Governor, the President of the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, as appropriate, for the remainder of the unexpired term. SECTION 2.  Section 37-29-130 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 37-29-130. PalmettoPride may accept gifts, bequests, and grants from any person or foundation, and also may receive and expend public funds appropriated to it or authorized by the General Assembly. Receipt of funds allocated to PalmettoPride shall flow through the Department of Parks, Recreation and TourismTransportation. Monies designated to the PalmettoPride-Litter Control Program pursuant to Section 14-1-208(10) must not be transferred or used for a purpose other than PalmettoPride-Litter Control. Unexpended funds must be carried forward and used only for authorized purposes. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----